idioms/sursilvan-override.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Frequent words with different forms in Sursilvan
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013


Multichar_Symbols +Art +Def +Indef ^| ^| +Prep
+Pron +Pers +Refl +Poss +Dem +Interrog
^DB +Noun +Nom +AccDat +Acc
+Masc +Fem +MF +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl
+Apo +Ton +Aton +Conj +Subj +Verb +PresInd
@U.FLEX.MSg@ @U.FLEX.FSg@ @U.FLEX.MPl@ @U.FLEX.FPl@

LEXICON Root
DEFINITE ;
DEFINITEWITHPREP ;
PERSONAL ;
REFLEXIVE ;
DEMONSTRATIVE ;
INTERROGATIVE ;
OTHERFORMS ;

! articles
LEXICON DEFINITE
il+Art+Def+Masc+Sg+Apo:igl	#;


LEXICON DEFINITEWITHPREP
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:dil	#;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:dils	#;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:dalla	#;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg+Apo:dall'	#;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:dallas	#;

a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:alla	#;
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg+Apo:all'	#;
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:allas	#;

cun+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:cul	#;
cun+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:culs	#;
cun+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:culla	#;
cun+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg+Apo:cull'	#;
cun+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:cullas	#;

sin+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:sil	#;
sin+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:sils	#;
sin+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:silla	#;
sin+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg+Apo:sill'	#;
sin+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:sillas	#;

! pronouns
LEXICON PERSONAL
! jau
jau+Pron+Pers+Nom+1P+MF+Sg:jeu	#;
jau+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Sg:mi	#;
! ti
ti+Pron+Pers+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Sg:ti	#;



LEXICON REFLEXIVE
! jau
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+1P+MF+Sg:mi	#;
! ti
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+2P+MF+Sg:ti	#;
! el, ella
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+3P+MF+Sg:si	#;
! els, ellas
sai+Pron+Refl+Acc+Ton+3P+MF+Pl:si	#;



LEXICON DEMONSTRATIVE
quai+Pron+Dem:quei	#;



LEXICON INTERROGATIVE
tge+Pron+Interrog:tgei	#;



!! Endings:
LEXICON REGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON REGULARSINGULAR
+Masc+Sg:0	#;
+Fem+Sg:a	#;

LEXICON REGULARPLURAL
+Masc+Pl:s	#;
+Fem+Pl:as	#;

LEXICON OTHERFORMS
! verbs
esser+Verb+PresInd+3P+Sg:ei	#;
